District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.25

Board and advisory committees.

(a)

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one or more committees of the board that consist of one or more directors.

(b)

Unless this chapter otherwise provides, the creation of a committee and appointment of directors to it shall be approved by the greater of:

(1)

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

(2)

The number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws to take action under § 29-406.24.

(c)

Sections 29-406.20 through 29-406.24 shall apply both to committees of the board and to their members.

(d)

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each committee may exercise the powers of the board of directors under § 29-406.01 except as limited by subsection (e) of this section.

(e)

A committee shall not:

(1)

Authorize distributions;

(2)

In the case of a membership corporation, approve or propose to members action that this chapter requires be approved by members;

(3)

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or, subject to subsection (g) of this section, on any of its committees; or

(4)

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws.

(f)

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee shall not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in § 29-406.30.

(g)

The board of directors may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of any committee to replace any absent or disqualified member during the member’s absence or disqualification.

(h)

A nonprofit corporation may create or authorize the creation of one or more advisory committees whose members need not be directors. An advisory committee shall not:

(1)

Be a committee of the board; and

(2)

Exercise any of the powers of the board.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-401.50.